Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.110

Commercial telephone solicitor—Duties and prohibited acts—Notice to customers.

(1) A person making a telephone solicitation must identify him [himself] or herself and the company or organization on whose behalf the solicitation is being made and the purpose of the call within the first 30 seconds of the telephone call.

(2) If, at any time during the telephone contact, the called party states or indicates that he or she wants to end the call, the telephone solicitor must end the call within 10 seconds.

(3) If at any time during the telephone contact, the called party states or indicates that he or she does not want to be called again by the commercial telephone solicitor or wants to have his or her name, individual telephone number, or other contact information removed from the telephone lists used by the commercial telephone solicitor:

(a) The commercial telephone solicitor shall inform the called party that his or her contact information will be removed from the telephone solicitor's telephone lists for at least one year;

(b) The commercial telephone solicitor shall end the call within 10 seconds;

(c) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not make any additional commercial telephone solicitation of the called party at any telephone number associated with that party within a period of at least one year; and

(d) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not sell or give the called party's name, telephone number, or other contact information to another commercial telephone solicitor: PROVIDED, That the commercial telephone solicitor may return the list, including the called party's name, telephone number, and other contact information to the company or organization from which it received the list.

(4) A commercial telephone solicitor shall not place calls to any person which will be received before 8:00 a.m. or after 8:00 p.m. at the call recipient's local time.

(5) The utilities and transportation commission shall by rule ensure that telecommunications companies inform their residential customers of the provisions of this section. The notification may be made by:

(a) Annual inserts in the billing statements mailed to residential customers; or

(b) Conspicuous publication of the notice in the consumer information pages of local telephone directories.

(6) If a sale or an agreement to purchase is completed, the commercial telephone solicitor must inform the purchaser of his or her cancellation rights as enunciated in this chapter, state the registration number issued by the department of licensing, and give the street address of the seller.

(7) If, at any time prior to sale or agreement to purchase, the commercial telephone solicitor's registration number is requested by the purchaser, it must be provided.

(8) All oral disclosures required by this section shall be made in a clear and intelligible manner.

[ 2022 c 195 s 3; 1989 c 20 s 11.]